trunk/incubator/apertium-fo-is.fo.dix
    <pardef n="ráð__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="flogferðsl/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>una</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uni</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnar</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="próstur__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnir</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mentanarstovnur"><i>mentanarstovnur</i><par n="próstur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bilatilboð"><i>bilatilboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="líkningarráð"><i>líkningarráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbeiðsmálaráð"><i>arbeiðsmálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vinnumálaráð"><i>vinnumálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="undirvísingarmálaráð"><i>undirvísingarmálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="døgurðaboð"><i>døgurðaboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stýringaramboð"><i>stýringaramboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirkjuráð"><i>kirkjuráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="undirvísingartilboð"><i>undirvísingartilboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sendiboð"><i>sendiboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="búskaparstýringaramboð"><i>búskaparstýringaramboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiskimálaráð"><i>fiskimálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbeiðsamboð"><i>arbeiðsamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="búskaparmálaráð"><i>búskaparmálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="harraboð"><i>harraboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="búskaparráð"><i>búskaparráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ælingur"><i>ælingur</i><par n="próstur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boð"><i>boð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbeiðstilboð"><i>arbeiðstilboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vinnulívsumboð"><i>vinnulívsumboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sveisiamboð"><i>sveisiamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="andstøðuumboð"><i>andstøðuumboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mið"><i>mið</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umhvørvisráð"><i>umhvørvisráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dáturáð"><i>dáturáð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fíggjarstýringsamboð"><i>fíggjarstýringsamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heilsuráð"><i>heilsuráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="handilsumboð"><i>handilsumboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skipsboð"><i>skipsboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deyðsboð"><i>deyðsboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bókasavnstilboð"><i>bókasavnstilboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doktaraboð"><i>doktaraboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbeiðsgevaraumboð"><i>arbeiðsgevaraumboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brúksráð"><i>brúksráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trygdarráð"><i>trygdarráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ráð"><i>ráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foreldraráð"><i>foreldraráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="búskaparamboð"><i>búskaparamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbeiðsumhvørvisráð"><i>arbeiðsumhvørvisráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hoyvíkingur"><i>hoyvíkingur</i><par n="próstur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="træamboð"><i>træamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skriviamboð"><i>skriviamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gerandisamboð"><i>gerandisamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flutningsamboð"><i>flutningsamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konuráð"><i>konuráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flogferðsla"><i>flogferðsl</i><par n="flogferðsl/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flutningstilboð"><i>flutningstilboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stýriamboð"><i>stýriamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sorgarboð"><i>sorgarboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oddalið"><i>oddalið</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="loyniráð"><i>loyniráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ilskuráð"><i>ilskuráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dómpróstur"><i>dómpróstur</i><par n="próstur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heildartilboð"><i>heildartilboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fagnarboð"><i>fagnarboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eftirlitsstovnur"><i>eftirlitsstovnur</i><par n="próstur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aðalfundarboð"><i>aðalfundarboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grindaboð"><i>grindaboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fíggjarmálaráð"><i>fíggjarmálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barnaansingarstovnur"><i>barnaansingarstovnur</i><par n="próstur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bókasavnsráð"><i>bókasavnsráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pussfiskur"><i>pussfiskur</i><par n="próstur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gleðiboð"><i>gleðiboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blaðboð"><i>blaðboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="próstur"><i>próstur</i><par n="próstur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="próvtøkuskeið"><i>próvtøkuskeið</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umhvørvismálaráð"><i>umhvørvismálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forsætismálaráð"><i>forsætismálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aliráð"><i>aliráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stjórnarráð"><i>stjórnarráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ferðslumálaráð"><i>ferðslumálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bygdarráð"><i>bygdarráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="býráð"><i>býráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fjallboð"><i>fjallboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prísráð"><i>prísráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stýriboð"><i>stýriboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="móðurráð"><i>móðurráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eykaumboð"><i>eykaumboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fakfelagsumboð"><i>fakfelagsumboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trygdarumboð"><i>trygdarumboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arbeiðsmarknaðarráð"><i>arbeiðsmarknaðarráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deildarfótbóltur"><i>deildarfótbóltur</i><par n="próstur__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brúkaraumboð"><i>brúkaraumboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flutningsmálaráð"><i>flutningsmálaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skipsráð"><i>skipsráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ansingartilboð"><i>ansingartilboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alnótsamboð"><i>alnótsamboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uppboð"><i>uppboð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skúlaráð"><i>skúlaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="býgdarráð"><i>býgdarráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="góðaráð"><i>góðaráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
    <e lm="floksráð"><i>floksráð</i><par n="ráð__n"/></e>
